Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1702
Purpose of
act.

It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage
the use of all proven techniques for the collection of child, spousal, and
medical support and monetary
judgments. While income withholding is the preferred technique,
other techniques such as liens on property and contempt proceedings should
be used when appropriate. The purpose of the Income Withholding for Child
Support Act is to provide a simplified and relatively automatic procedure
for implementing income withholding in order to guarantee that child, spousal,
and medical support obligations and
monetary judgments are met when income is available for that purpose,
to encourage voluntary withholding by obligors, and to facilitate the implementation
of income withholding based on foreign support orders.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 22;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 18;

Laws 2010, LB712, § 28.